src-fst-morphology-root.lexc.md
| @P.number.one@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @P.number.two@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @P.number.three@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @P.number.four@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @P.number.five@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @P.number.six@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @P.number.seven@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @P.number.eight@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @P.number.nine@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @P.number.ten@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @P.number.zero@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;

## Lexc lexica

### Root lexicon

The word forms in Veps start from the lexeme roots of basic 
word classes. 
### Other lexica

CC_ 

CS_ 

INTERJ_ 

ADV_ 

ADV_MANNER 

ADV_ADE 
ADV_ABL 
ADV_ALL 
ADV_ELA 
ADV_ILL 
ADV_INE 
ADV_LAT 

ADV_TEMP 

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/root.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-vep/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/root.lexc)</small>
